District of Columbia statutes.
38-108

Classification by correlated subjects.

The Board of Education shall classify all academic and scientific subjects in the Central, Eastern, Western, and Business High Schools, and the McKinley Manual Training School into 8 departments so that each department shall contain correlated subjects, and the M Street High School and the Armstrong Manual Training School shall be similarly classified into 4 departments so that each department shall contain correlated subjects.

History

June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 319, ch. 3446, § 5(1)
Apr. 22, 1968, 82 Stat. 102, Pub. L. 90-292, § 3(d)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-112.
1973 Ed., § 31-112.